Ohio, session 136, HB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3724.01, 3724.02, 3724.03, 3724.04, 3724.05, 3724.06, 3724.07, 3724.08, 3724.09, 3724.10, 3724.99, 5164.27, and 5166.111 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3724.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3722.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Licensed practical nurse" and "registered nurse" have the same meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Medically dependent or technologically dependent child" means an individual who is less than twenty-one years of age and requires, as a result of a medical condition, continuous therapeutic interventions or skilled nursing supervision. (D) "Owner or operator" means any individual who owns or has general administrative charge of a prescribed pediatric extended care center. (E) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (F) "Prescribed pediatric extended care center" means a facility other than a hospital, whether operated for profit or not, that provides and delivers, or allows for the provision of, services, supports, and therapies to medically dependent or technologically dependent children and their legal guardians as described in section 3724.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.02. No person, firm, organization, institution, or agency shall knowingly operate a prescribed pediatric extended care center without a license issued under this chapter. Sec. 3724.03. (A) A person, firm, organization, institution, or agency seeking a license to operate a prescribed pediatric extended care center shall file with the director of health an application in a manner prescribed by the director. The application shall include all the information the director considers necessary to process the application, including evidence satisfactory to the director that the applicant satisfies the requirements of division (B) of this section. (B) To be eligible to receive a license to operate a prescribed pediatric extended care center, an applicant shall satisfy all of the following requirements: (1) Hold a current, valid child care center license issued under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code and operate the child care center at the same address at which the prescribed pediatric extended care center will operate; (2) Contract with or employ a medical director who is a physician specializing in pediatric medicine and has at least three years of clinical experience in that specialty; (3) Contract with or employ one or more nurse managers, with each nurse manager being a registered nurse with clinical experience in pediatric nursing; (4) Submit an initial application fee of one thousand dollars or, in the case of an applicant that already holds a license to operate a prescribed pediatric extended care center, an initial application fee of two hundred fifty dollars. (C) The director shall review all applications received under this section. After receiving an application the director considers complete, the director shall determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for a license to operate a prescribed pediatric extended care center. Sec. 3724.04. (A) If the director of health determines that an applicant meets the requirements of section 3724.03 of the Revised Code, the director shall issue the license to the applicant. (B) The license shall be valid for three years, unless revoked or suspended, shall expire on the date that is three years after the date of issuance, and may be renewed for additional three-year periods in accordance with division (C) of this section and rules adopted under section 3724.05 of the Revised Code. (C) To renew a license issued under this section, a prescribed pediatric extended care center shall, on or before the license's expiration date, apply to the director of health for renewal. Renewal applications shall be submitted to the director in a manner prescribed by the director. Each application shall be accompanied by a renewal fee of five hundred dollars. The director shall renew a license if the director determines that the applicant holds a current, valid child care center license issued under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code and meets the requirements for renewal established in rules adopted under section 3724.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.05. (A) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, the director of health shall adopt rules establishing standards and procedures for the licensure and regulation of prescribed pediatric extended care centers, including rules that do all of the following: (1) Establish license application and renewal procedures; (2) Specify the reasons for which the department may refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or revoke a license or otherwise impose discipline on a license holder; (3) Establish standards for providing and delivering, and for allowing for the provision of, the services, supports, and therapies described in section 3724.06 of the Revised Code, in particular, in a manner that is family-centered while also individualized for each medically dependent or technologically dependent child and the child's caregiver and in a setting that is both integrated and inclusive; (4) Establish standards to ensure that the center's conditions and physical surroundings are healthy, safe, and sanitary; (5) Establish minimum qualifications for employment as an operator, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or other staff member as well as training requirements for such employees; (6) Specify the manner in which medical records, data, and other information relating to the children and families receiving services, supports, and therapies are to be maintained; (7) Establish standards and procedures for providing medical transportation services to and from prescribed pediatric extended care centers, including by ensuring both of the following: (a) That nursing support is available when such services are provided; (b) That a provider of medical transportation services is prohibited from providing such services to and from a center if the provider is related to the center's owner or operator by blood, marriage, or adoption. (8) Establish procedures and a timeline for conducting center inspections and audits. The director also may adopt any other rules the director considers necessary to implement and administer this chapter. (B) The rules described in this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.06. (A)(1) A prescribed pediatric extended care center licensed under this chapter may provide and deliver at the center, for a part of the day, any of the following nonresidential services to medically dependent or technologically dependent children who are not related to the center's owner or operator by blood, marriage, or adoption: (a) Medical services; (b) Nursing services; (c) Psychosocial services; (d) Developmental education. (2) The center also may provide and deliver services to meet the caregiver training needs of a medically dependent or technologically dependent child's legal guardian. (B) In addition to the services a prescribed pediatric extended care center may provide and deliver under division (A) of this section, the center may allow for any of the following nonresidential services, supports, and therapies to be provided, for a part of the day, at the center: (1) Speech therapy; (2) Occupational therapy; (3) Physical therapy; (4) Social work services; (5) Developmental services; (6) Child life services; (7) Psychological services; (8) Behavioral supports. In allowing for the services, supports, and therapies described in this division to be provided for at the center, the center may contract with another entity to provide those services, supports, and therapies. Sec. 3724.07. In operating a prescribed pediatric extended care center, a center is subject to all of the following requirements: (A) The center shall maintain the following medically dependent or technologically dependent child-to-staff ratios: (1) When caring for not more than twelve children, two registered nurses; (2) When caring for at least thirteen but not more than twenty children, two registered nurses and one licensed practical nurse; (3) When caring for at least twenty-one but not more than thirty children, three registered nurses and two licensed practical nurses. For every eight children added to the thirty children described in division (A)(3) of this section, the center shall ensure that another registered nurse is providing care, in addition to the three registered nurses described in that division. (B) A nurse manager, or nurse manager's designee, shall be present at the center during its hours of operation. (C) The center shall utilize an electronic medical records system to maintain records relating to the medically dependent and technologically dependent children it enrolls. Such a system shall include all of the following records: daily assessments, medication lists, and reports of medications administered, medication errors, and therapeutic interventions. The center shall ensure that the system allows for periodic audits and assists the center in implementing internal compliance programs. (D) The center shall assist the department of health in any audits the department conducts of the center, including those related to the center's delivery of and billing for services. (E) The center shall consider both of the following when prioritizing enrollment of medically dependent or technologically dependent children: (1) The employment status of parents; (2) The extent of children's medical needs. Sec. 3724.08. (A) Before a medically dependent or technologically dependent child may enroll in a prescribed pediatric extended care center, the child's parent or legal guardian shall submit to the center a referral from the child's provider, describing the child's medical condition, medical stability, and the continuous therapeutic interventions or skilled nursing supervision that the child requires. (B) Once a medically dependent or technologically dependent child enrolls and begins to receive services, supports, and therapies as described in division (A) of section 3724.06 of the Revised Code, the child shall remain under the care of a provider other than the center's medical director. The center's medical director, in consultation with the child's provider and parent or legal guardian, shall develop for the child a treatment plan that outlines the child's required therapeutic interventions and skilled nursing supervision. The center's nurse manager shall coordinate the implementation of the child's treatment plan, with the plan's interventions and skilled nursing to be administered by either a registered nurse employed by the center or a licensed practical nurse employed by the center and under the direct supervision of the registered nurse. (C) The center's medical director shall be available either in person or by electronic communication to consult with the center's nurse manager and other nursing staff. On at least a monthly basis, the medical director shall review each child's treatment plan and medical records and shall update the plan as necessary. Sec. 3724.09. The department of health may refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or revoke a license or otherwise impose discipline on a license holder for any violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it. Such discipline may include the imposition of a civil penalty in an amount not more than five hundred dollars for each violation and for each day the violation continues. Sec. 3724.10. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a child care center licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code from providing, or continuing to provide, special needs child care, as that term is defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.99. Whoever violates section 3724.02 of the Revised Code shall be fined in an amount not less than five hundred dollars and not more than ten thousand dollars for each offense. Sec. 5164.27. (A) As used in this section, "medically dependent or technologically dependent child" and "prescribed pediatric extended care center" have the same meanings as in section 3724.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The medicaid director shall seek approval from the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services to cover services provided by a prescribed pediatric extended care center, as described in division (A)(1) of section 3724.06 of the Revised Code, to medically dependent or technologically dependent children in this state as part of the early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment program. (C) To be eligible to receive medicaid payments under this section, a prescribed pediatric extended care center shall hold both of the following: (1) A valid license issued under section 3724.04 of the Revised Code; (2) A valid medicaid provider agreement. Sec. 5166.111. Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, the department of medicaid shall establish pediatric-specific processes for level of care determinations that apply when determining if an individual qualifies for services provided under the Ohio home care waiver program.